Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1041.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature recognizes that Washington has a target of zero injuries and deaths for users of its roadways and transportation system. Replacement tires with increased tread and durability are important options in helping provide increased safety for drivers in rugged, wet, or icy conditions. The federal government is responsible for the motor vehicle standards, including tires. Therefore, state and local governments may not restrict the manufacture, use, or sale of tires that are in compliance with the federal motor vehicle safety standards prescribed pursuant to 49 U.S.C. Sec. 30111. The legislature is protecting the freedom of choice for people to purchase and use tires they want that meet federal motor vehicle safety standards.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. (1) Any person may manufacture, use, or sell passenger vehicle tires within the state that are in compliance with the federal motor vehicle safety standards prescribed pursuant to 49 U.S.C. Sec. 30111.(2) State agencies and local governmental agencies may not issue rules that restrict or ban the manufacture, sale, or use of tires based on their energy efficiency or rolling resistance rating.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 70A.05 RCW to read as follows:State and local governmental agencies shall not restrict or regulate the use or sale of tires under this chapter.Sec. 4. RCW 70A.30.010 and 2020 c 143 s 1 and 2020 c 20 s 1366 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) Pursuant to the federal clean air act, the legislature adopts the California motor vehicle emission standards in Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations. ((The))Except as provided for in subsection (3) of this section, the department of ecology shall adopt rules to implement the motor vehicle emission standards of the state of California, including the zero emission vehicle program, and shall amend the rules from time to time, to maintain consistency with the California motor vehicle emission standards and 42 U.S.C. Sec. 7507 (section 177 of the federal clean air act).(2) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use by a resident of this state of a motor vehicle acquired and used while the resident is a member of the armed services and is stationed outside this state pursuant to military orders.(3) The department may not adopt restrictions on the manufacture, sale, or use of vehicle tires even if the California Code of Regulations includes such restrictions.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 70A.45 RCW to read as follows:State and local governmental agencies shall not restrict or regulate the use or sale of tires under this chapter as part of a greenhouse gases reduction strategy.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. Section 2 of this act constitutes a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.--- END ---